Utah statutes.
4-39-401.   Escape of domesticated elk -- Liability.
(1)  It is the owner's responsibility to try to capture any domesticated elk
that may have escaped.
(2)  The escape of a domesticated elk shall be reported immediately to the
state veterinarian or a brand inspector of the Department of Agriculture who
shall notify the Division of Wildlife Resources.
(3)  If the domesticated elk is not recovered within 72 hours of the escape,
the Department of Agriculture, in conjunction with the Division of Wildlife
Resources, shall take whatever action is necessary to resolve the problem.
(4)  The owner shall reimburse the state or a state agency for any reasonable
recapture costs that may be incurred in the recapture or destruction of the
animal.
(5)  Any escaped domesticated elk taken by a licensed hunter in a manner which
complies with the provisions of Title 23 and the rules of the Wildlife Board
shall be considered to be a legal taking and neither the licensed hunter, the
state, nor a state agency shall be liable to the owner for the killing.
(6)  The owner shall be responsible to contain the domesticated elk to ensure
that there is no spread of disease from domesticated elk to wild elk and that
the genetic purity of wild elk is protected.
